District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.51

Transfer of Southwest Waterfront Properties.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 30aa
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 201(a)(4), 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-287, § 101(a), 54 DCR 969
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201(a)(4) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).
Delegation of Authority to the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development, see Mayor’s Order 2006-103, July 28, 2006 ( 53 DCR 6398).
For additional requirements for the transfer of certain NCRC properties, see sections 201 through 209 of D.C. Law 16-287.